Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-154
Knox.

The county of Knox is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township twenty-nine, north, of range eight, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township twenty-nine, north, of range two, west; thence north to the middle of the main channel of the Missouri River; thence along the middle of the main channel of said river to the point where the dividing line between ranges eight and nine, west, intersects the same; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 33, p. 218, § 60, p. 224;

Laws 1883, c. 34, § 1, p. 201;

R.S.1913, § 867;

C.S.1922, § 769;

C.S.1929, § 25-156;

R.S.1943, § 22-154.